Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-3549
Examination; board prepare.

(1) The board shall prepare an examination on the statutes, rules, regulations, and other requirements unique to Nebraska.

(2) The board may update or make changes to such examination as it deems necessary.

Laws 2025, LB38, § 39.